apertium-rus.rus.dix
    <pardef n="реш/иться__vblex_perf">
      <e><p><l>иться</l><r>иться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ись</l><r>иться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>итесь</l><r>иться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ившись</l><r>иться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ивш</l><r>иться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="actv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__английск/ий"/><p><l>ся</l><r></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ился</l><r>иться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>илась</l><r>иться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>илось</l><r>иться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ились</l><r>иться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>усь</l><r>иться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>имся</l><r>иться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ишься</l><r>иться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>итесь</l><r>иться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ится</l><r>иться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>атся</l><r>иться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <pardef n="преодол/еть__vblex_perf">
      <e><p><l>еть</l><r>еть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ей</l><r>еть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ейте</l><r>еть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ев</l><r>еть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ённ</l><r>еть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__счастлив/ый"/></e>
      <e><p><l>евш</l><r>еть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="actv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__английск/ий"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ел</l><r>еть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ела</l><r>еть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ело</l><r>еть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ели</l><r>еть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ею</l><r>еть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>еем</l><r>еть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>еешь</l><r>еть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>еете</l><r>еть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>еет</l><r>еть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>еют</l><r>еть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
      
    <!-- PARDEFS: Interjections -->  

    <pardef n="да__ij">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
      
    <!-- PARDEFS: Abbreviations -->  

    <pardef n="км__abbr">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
   </pardefs>

    <e lm="закончиться"><i>законч</i><par n="реш/иться__vblex_perf"/></e>
    <e lm="кончиться"><i>конч</i><par n="реш/иться__vblex_perf"/></e>
    <e lm="научиться"><i>науч</i><par n="реш/иться__vblex_perf"/></e>
    <e lm="получиться"><i>получ</i><par n="реш/иться__vblex_perf"/></e>
    <e lm="преодолеть"><i>преодол</i><par n="преодол/еть__vblex_perf"/></e>
    <e lm="решиться"><i>реш</i><par n="реш/иться__vblex_perf"/></e>
    <e lm="сложиться"><i>слож</i><par n="реш/иться__vblex_perf"/></e>
    <e lm="случиться"><i>случ</i><par n="реш/иться__vblex_perf"/></e>
    <e lm="ага"><i>ага</i><par n="да__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ай"><i>ай</i><par n="да__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="алло"><i>алло</i><par n="да__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="аминь"><i>аминь</i><par n="да__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ах"><i>ах</i><par n="да__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="вира"><i>вира</i><par n="да__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="да"><i>да</i><par n="да__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="итак"><i>итак</i><par n="да__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="нет"><i>нет</i><par n="да__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ну"><i>ну</i><par n="да__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="однако"><i>однако</i><par n="да__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ой"><i>ой</i><par n="да__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="пожалуйста"><i>пожалуйста</i><par n="да__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="привет"><i>привет</i><par n="да__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="спасибо"><i>спасибо</i><par n="да__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="стоп"><i>стоп</i><par n="да__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="тьфу"><i>тьфу</i><par n="да__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="увы"><i>увы</i><par n="да__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ура"><i>ура</i><par n="да__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="э"><i>э</i><par n="да__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="эй"><i>эй</i><par n="да__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="к сожалению"><i>к<b/>сожалению</i><par n="да__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="пожалуй"><i>пожалуй</i><par n="да__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="см"><i>см</i><par n="км__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="км"><i>км</i><par n="км__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="мм"><i>мм</i><par n="км__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="кг"><i>кг</i><par n="км__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="мг"><i>мг</i><par n="км__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="млн"><i>млн</i><par n="км__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="н. э."><i>н.<b/>э.</i><par n="км__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="и т. д."><i>и<b/>т.<b/>д.</i><par n="км__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="и т. п."><i>и<b/>т.<b/>п.</i><par n="км__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="и т. п." r="RL"><p><l>и<b/>т.<b/>п.</l><r>и т. п</r></p><par n="км__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="выводиться"><i>вывод</i><par n="реш/иться__vblex_perf"/></e>
<e lm="завершиться"><i>заверш</i><par n="реш/иться__vblex_perf"/></e>
<e lm="уменьшиться"><i>уменьш</i><par n="реш/иться__vblex_perf"/></e>
<e lm="сосредоточиться"><i>сосредоточ</i><par n="реш/иться__vblex_perf"/></e>
<e lm="ухудшиться"><i>ухудш</i><par n="реш/иться__vblex_perf"/></e>
